Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 11 Prevention of Public Offenses
12-12-919. Termination of obligation to register.

Was found to have committed an aggravated sex offense;

Was determined by the court to be or assessed as a Level 4 sexually dangerous person;

Has pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to or been found guilty of a second or subsequent sex offense under a separate case number, not multiple counts on the same charge;

(1)(A)(i)(a)Any other sex offender required to register under this subchapter may apply for an order terminating the obligation to register to the sentencing court fifteen (15) years after the date the sex offender first registered in Arkansas.

If the sex offender was incarcerated in a correctional facility, the date the sex offender first registered in Arkansas is the date the sex offender registered upon his or her release from the correctional facility.

After fifteen (15) years of having been registered as a sex offender in Arkansas, a sex offender sentenced in another state but permanently residing in Arkansas may apply for an order terminating the obligation to register in the circuit court of the county in which the sex offender resides or has last resided within this state.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 989, § 19; 1999, No. 1353, § 13; 2001, No. 1743, § 14; 2003 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 21, § 10; 2013, No. 172, § 4; 2013, No. 505, § 17; 2013, No. 1248, §
1; 2015, No. 358, § 11; 2015, No. 1285, § 2; 2017, No. 382, § 1; 2017, No. 538, § 1; 2019, No. 800, § 1.

12-12-920. Immunity from civil liability.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 989, § 20; 1999, No. 1353, § 14.

12-12-921. Sex Offender Assessment Committee.

The Governor shall appoint, subject to confirmation by the Senate:

If a vacancy of one (1) of the members appointed by the Governor occurs for any reason other than expiration of a regular term, the vacancy shall be filled for the unexpired portion of the term by appointment of the Governor.

A member of the committee appointed by the Governor may be removed by the Governor for neglect of duty or malfeasance in office.

A member shall be considered active unless his or her resignation has been submitted or requested by the Governor or he or she has more than two (2) unexcused absences from meetings in a twelve-month period and this fact has been reported to the Governor's office.

The committee shall meet at least quarterly.

A special meeting may be called by the chair or as provided by the rules adopted by the committee.

The report shall contain:

History.

Acts 2003 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 21, § 11; 2005, No. 1962, § 38.

12-12-922. Alternative procedure for sexually dangerous person evaluations — Administrative review of assigned risk level.

(A)Examiners qualified by the Sex Offender Assessment Committee shall include in the assessment of any sex offender convicted of a sex offense a review as to whether the frequency, repetition over time, severity of trauma to the victim, or established pattern of predatory behaviors suggests that the sex offender is likely to engage in future predatory sexual offenses.

Documents or information not available at the time of assessment have a bearing on the risk that the sex offender poses to the community; or

The assessment is not supported by substantial evidence.

Unless a request for an administrative review is received by the committee within twenty (20) days of postmark of the advisement of risk level notification sent to the sex offender sent by certified mail and first-class mail or delivered by personal service, an offender fact sheet shall be made available to law enforcement so that community notification may commence. Receipt of the advisement of risk level notification will be presumed within five (5) days of postmark of the advisement of risk level notification by both certified mail and first-class mail.

If a request for an administrative review is received by the committee, the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction may make community notification at the level upon which administrative review has been requested.

(A)A member of the committee shall conduct the review and respond within thirty (30) days of receiving a request for an administrative review.

If additional time is needed to obtain facts, the committee shall notify the sex offender requesting the review.

(A)(i)The findings of the administrative review shall be sent to the sex offender by certified mail. Community notification at the risk level assigned in the administrative review shall commence five (5) calendar days after the postmark of the advisement of the findings of the administrative review.

Upon receipt of the findings, the sex offender has thirty (30) days to file a petition under the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, §25-15-201 et seq., for judicial review in the Pulaski County Circuit Court or in the circuit court of the county where the sex offender resides or does business.

The circuit court shall refuse to hear any appeal of an assigned risk level by a sex offender unless the circuit court finds that the administrative remedies available to the sex offender under this subsection have been exhausted.

(A)(i)A copy of the petition for judicial review shall be served on the executive secretary of the committee in accordance with the Arkansas Rules of Civil Procedure.

When the petition for judicial review has been served on the executive secretary of the committee, a record of the committee's findings and copies of all records in its possession shall be furnished by the committee to the circuit court within thirty (30) days of service.

The committee may ask the circuit court to seal statements of victims, medical records, and other items that could place third parties at risk of harm.

A ruling by the circuit court on the petition for judicial review is considered a final judgment.

History.

Acts 2003 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 21, § 12; 2005, No. 1962, § 39; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 4, § 6; 2007, No. 394, § 10; 2011, No. 286, § 1; 2013, No. 505, §§ 18, 19; 2013, No. 1129, § 4.

12-12-923. Electronic monitoring of sex offenders.

(1)Upon release from incarceration, a sex offender determined to be a sexually dangerous person whose crime was committed after April 7, 2006, is subject to electronic monitoring for a period of not less than ten (10) years from the date of the sex offender's release.

Within three (3) days after release from incarceration, a sex offender subject to electronic monitoring under subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall:

Report to the agency responsible under §12-12-915 for supervising the sex offender; and

Submit to the placement of electronic monitoring equipment upon his or her body.

The agency responsible under §12-12-915 for supervising the sex offender subject to electronic monitoring shall:

(1)(A)Unless a sex offender subject to electronic monitoring is indigent, he or she is required to reimburse the supervising agency a reasonable fee to defray the supervision costs.

(A)The supervising agency shall determine the amount to be paid by a sex offender based on his or her financial means and ability to pay.

Subdivision (e)(1) of this section does not apply to the owner of the electronic monitoring equipment or an agent of the owner performing ordinary maintenance or repairs to the electronic monitoring equipment.

History.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 4, § 7; 2013, No. 505, §§ 20, 21.

12-12-924. Disclosure and notification concerning out-of-state sex offenders moving into Arkansas.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 100, § 1.

12-12-925. Travel outside of the United States.

The dates of travel; and

The foreign country, colony, territory, or possessions that the sex offender will visit.

Upon receiving information from a local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction under this section, the center shall immediately report the information to the National Sex Offender Public Website and to the United States Marshals Service.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 508, § 12; 2017, No. 916, § 10.

12-12-926. Release of motor vehicle records by the Department of Finance and Administration.

The information is required for the law enforcement officer or agency to comply with this subchapter; and

The use of the information by the law enforcement officer or agency is related to public safety.

Required by this subchapter; and

Related to public safety.

A person's Social Security number; or

A person's medical or disability information.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 508, § 13.

12-12-927. Medicaid services by sex offender prohibited.

If a court has entered an order requiring a person to register as a sex offender or if the person is listed in the Federal Bureau of Investigation's National Sex Offender Registry, the United States Department of Justice Dru Sjodin National Sex Offender Public Website, or both, the person shall not provide goods or services under the Arkansas Medicaid Program.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1504, § 2.

Cross References. Status as a registered sex offender, §12-12-1513.

12-12-928. Prohibition against recording a person under 14 years of age — Notification.

A person required to register as a sex offender under this subchapter and who has been assessed as a Level 3 or Level 4 sex offender shall be notified at his or her assessment that he or she is prohibited from recording a person under fourteen (14) years of age under §5-14-137.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 621, § 3.

12-12-929. Registered offender prohibited from holding position of public trust — Definition.

As used in this section, “position of public trust” means a position that:

Is in a public agency that provides public safety services, including without limitation a fire department, law enforcement agency, or emergency medical services agency; and

As part of the ordinary course of the duties of the position, requires a person holding the position to have direct physical contact with or come within the immediate vicinity of a member of the public outside of the building in which the public agency is located.

A sex offender who is required to register under the Sex Offender Registration Act of 1997, § 12-12-901 et seq., and who has been assessed as a Level 2, Level 3, or Level 4 offender may not hold a position of public trust.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2009, No. 974, § 1, provided: “This act shall be known and may be cited as ‘Juli's Law’.”

Effective Dates. Acts 1994 (2nd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 37 and 38, § 7: Aug. 25, 1994. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that serious criminal offenses committed by juveniles have increased to an alarming level and that it will help to deal with these serious juvenile crimes by authorizing the Arkansas Crime Information Center to accumulate juvenile arrest information for those allegations and adjudications of dependency for which the Arkansas Juvenile Code authorizes fingerprints to be taken and maintained, and it will assist in juvenile crime prevention to allow the dissemination of conviction information to nongovernmental entities authorized by federal law; that this act so provides; and this act should go into effect immediately in order to provide additional tools for dealing with juvenile crime as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 447, § 5: Mar. 12, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Arkansas Crime Information Center requires additional funds on July 1, 1997, to operate the automated criminal history system; that the system must be operated efficiently to support the State Police and local law enforcement entities in their efforts; that the agency does not currently have the funds and staff necessary to carry out the mandates of the Legislature; that the acquisition of the State Police Automated Fingerprint Identification System was funded by means other than those provided in Arkansas Code 12-12-1012(b)(1); and that operation of the Automated Findgerprint System by the State Police has caused an increase in the operating costs of the Arkansas Crime Information Center. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1997, No. 1102, § 9: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-First General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1997 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1997 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1997.”

Acts 2005, No. 1573, § 6: Apr. 5, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the dissemination of complete, accurate, and timely criminal history information is necessary for the protection of the people of the State of Arkansas; and that this act is needed to provide necessary access to criminal history information. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2009, No. 762, § 12: Sept. 1, 2009. Effective date clause provided: “This act shall be effective September 1, 2009.”

Acts 2011, No. 699, § 2: Mar. 24, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that Juli's law is intended to protect Arkansans from heinous crimes; that rape is a heinous crime that can occur at any time; that the protections under Juli's Law will be enhanced by the addition of rape as a reportable crime; and because no time should be lost in providing this protection to the people of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 1460, § 17: Jan. 1, 2014. Effective date clause provided: “This act becomes effective on and after January 1, 2014.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 987, § 1.

Subchapter 10

— Criminal History Information and Reporting Standards

12-12-1001. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Administration of criminal justice” means performing functions of investigation, apprehension, detention, prosecution, adjudication, correctional supervision, or rehabilitation of accused persons or criminal offenders.

“Administration of criminal justice” also includes criminal identification activities and the collection, maintenance, and dissemination of criminal justice information;

“Arrest tracking number” means a unique number assigned to an arrestee at the time of each arrest that is used to link that arrest to the final disposition of that charge;

“Central repository” means the Arkansas Crime Information Center, which is authorized to collect, maintain, and disseminate criminal history information;

“CODIS” means the Federal Bureau of Investigation Laboratory's Combined DNA Index System that allows the storage and exchange of DNA records submitted by federal forensic laboratories, state forensic laboratories, and local forensic laboratories;

“Conviction information” means criminal history information disclosing that a person has pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to, or was found guilty of, a criminal offense in a court of law, together with sentencing information;

“Criminal history information” means a record compiled by a central repository or the Identification Bureau of the Department of Arkansas State Police on an individual consisting of names and identification data, notations of arrests, detentions, indictments, informations, or other formal criminal charges. This record also includes any dispositions of the charges, as well as notations on correctional supervision and release.

“Criminal history information” does not include fingerprint records on individuals not involved in the criminal justice system or driver history records;

“Criminal history information system” means the equipment, procedures, agreements, and organizations thereof, for the compilation, processing, preservation, and dissemination of criminal history information;

“Criminal justice agency” means a government agency or any subunit of a government agency that is authorized by law to perform the administration of criminal justice and that allocates more than one-half (1/2) its annual budget to the administration of criminal justice;

“Criminal justice official” means an employee of a criminal justice agency performing the administration of criminal justice;

“Disposition” means information describing the outcome of any criminal charges, including notations that law enforcement officials have elected not to refer the matter to a prosecutor, that a prosecutor has elected not to commence criminal proceedings, or that proceedings have been indefinitely postponed.

“Disposition” also includes acquittals, dismissals, probations, charges pending due to mental disease or defect, guilty pleas, nolle prosequi, nolo contendere pleas, findings of guilt, youthful offender determinations, first offender programs, pardons, commuted sentences, mistrials in which the defendant is discharged, executive clemencies, paroles, releases from correctional supervision, or deaths;

“Dissemination” means disclosing criminal history information or the absence of criminal history information to any person or organization outside the agency possessing the criminal history information;

“DNA” means deoxyribonucleic acid that is located in the cells of an individual, provides an individual's personal genetic blueprint, and encodes genetic information that is the basis of human heredity and forensic identification;

“DNA record” means DNA identification information stored in the State DNA Data Base or CODIS for the purpose of generating investigative leads or supporting statistical interpretation of DNA test results.

The DNA record is the result obtained from the DNA typing tests.

The DNA record is composed of the characteristics of a DNA sample that are of value in establishing the identity of individuals.

The results of all DNA identification tests on an individual's DNA sample also are collectively referred to as the DNA profile of an individual;

“DNA sample” means a blood, saliva, or tissue sample provided by any individual as required by this subchapter or submitted to the State Crime Laboratory for analysis or storage, or both;

“Identification Bureau” means the Identification Bureau of the Department of Arkansas State Police, which may maintain fingerprint card files and other identification information on individuals;

“Juvenile aftercare and custody information” means information maintained by the Division of Youth Services of the Department of Human Services regarding the status of a juvenile committed to or otherwise placed in the custody of the division from the date of commitment until the juvenile is released from aftercare or custody, whichever is later.

“Juvenile aftercare and custody information” may include the name, address, and phone number of a contact person or an entity responsible for the juvenile;

“Nonconviction information” means arrest information without disposition if an interval of one (1) year has elapsed from the date of arrest and no active prosecution of the charge is pending, as well as all acquittals and all dismissals;

“Pending information” means criminal history information in some stage of active prosecution or processing; and

“Sealed record” means a record that was sealed under the Comprehensive Criminal Record Sealing Act of 2013, § 16-90-1401 et seq.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment inserted present (2), and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly.

The 2009 amendment inserted present (4) and (12) through (15); deleted former (11); redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; and made minor stylistic changes throughout.

The 2013 amendment, in (15) (now (19)), substituted “Sealed” for “Expunged” and “sealed under the Comprehensive Criminal Record Sealing Act of 2013, §16-90-1401” for “expunged under §16-90-901”.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1109, § 1; 2001, No. 1048, § 1; 2005, No. 1962, § 40; 2009, No. 974, § 2; 2013, No. 1460, § 3.